North Dakota, session 69, HB1466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 5-01-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
5-01-01. Definitions.
In this title:
1. "Alcohol" means neutral spirits distilled at or above one hundred ninety degrees proof,
whether or not such product is subsequently reduced, for nonindustrial use.
2. "Alcoholic beverages" means any liquid suitable for drinking by human beings, which contains
one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume.
3. "Beer" means any malt beverage containing one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by
volume and includes an alcoholic beverage made by the fermentation of malt substitutes,
including rice, grain of any kind, glucose, sugar, or molasses, which has not undergone
distillation.
4. "Bottle or can" means any container, regardless of the material from which made, having a
capacity less than a bulk container for use for the sale of malt beverages at retail.
5. "Direct shipper" means a person that is licensed by the commissioner and ships or causes to
be shipped alcoholic beverages directly into this state to a consumer for the consumer's
personal use and not for resale.
6. "Distilled spirits" means any alcoholic beverage that is not beer, wine, sparkling wine, or
alcohol.
7. "Domestic distillery" means a distillery that produces twenty - five thousand gallons [94635
liters] or fewer of distilled spirits per year.
8. "In bulk" means in containers having a capacity not less than one-sixth barrel for use for the
sale of malt beverages at retail.
8.9. "Licensed alcohol carrier" means a person licensed to transport or deliver alcoholic beverages
to a consumer without first having the alcoholic beverage delivered through a wholesaler
licensed in this state.
9.10. "Licensed logistics shipper" means a person that provides fulfillment house services, including
warehousing, packaging, distribution, order processing, or shipment of alcoholic beverages on
behalf of a licensed direct shipper and by way of a licensed alcohol carrier.
10.11. "Licensed premises" means the premises on which beer, liquor, or alcoholic beverages are
normally sold or dispensed and must be delineated by diagram or blueprint which must be
included with the license application or the license renewal application.

H. B. NO. 1466 - PAGE 2
11.12. "Liquor" means any alcoholic beverage except beer.
12.13. "Local governing body" means the governing entity of a city, county, or federally recognized
Indian tribe in this state.
13.14. "Local license" means a city, county, or tribal retail alcoholic beverage license issued by the
appropriate local governing body.
15. "Manufacturing distillery" means a distillery that produces forty thousand gallons [151416
liters] or fewer of distilled spirits per year.
14.16. "Microbrew pub" means a brewer that brews ten thousand or fewer barrels of beer per year
and sells beer produced or manufactured on the premises for consumption on or off the
premises or serves beer produced or manufactured on the premises for purposes of sampling
the beer.
15.17. "Organization" means a domestic or foreign corporation, general partnership, limited
partnership, or limited liability company.
18. "Satellite location" means an offsite location owned or leased by a manufacturing distillery to
conduct retail operations.
16.19. "Sparkling wine" means wine made effervescent with carbon dioxide.
17.20. "Supplier" means an alcoholic beverage manufacturer, importer, marketer, or wholesaler
selling alcoholic beverages to a wholesaler licensed in this state for purposes of resale.
18.21. "Tribal licensee" means a person issued a local license by the governing body of a federally
recognized Indian tribe in this state for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages within the exterior
tribal reservation boundaries.
19.22. "Twenty-one years of age" means it is after eight a.m. on the date twenty-one years after a
person's date of birth.
20.23. "Wine" means the alcoholic beverage obtained by fermentation of agricultural products
containing natural or added sugar or such beverage fortified with brandy and containing not
more than twenty-four percent alcohol by volume.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 5-01-19.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
5-01-19.1. Direct sale by domestic distilleries.
1. A domestic distillery that produces no more than twelve thousand proof gallons [4200045425
liters] of spirits per year may sell and deliver, onsite or offsite, the spirits produced by the
distillery directly to licensed retailers. The distillery may sell and deliver spirits onsite to a
licensed retailer that presents the retailer's license or a photocopy of the license. The distillery
may deliver the spirits offsite if the distillery:
a. Uses the distillery's equipment, trucks, and employees to deliver the spirits;
b. Contracts with a licensed distributor to ship and deliver the spirits to the retailer; or
c. Contracts with a common carrier to ship and deliver the spirits to the retailer directly from
the distillery or the distillery's warehouse.
2. The total amount of spirits each domestic distillery may sell or deliver directly to all licensed
retailers may not exceed two hundred cases per year. Individual shipments delivered by

H. B. NO. 1466 - PAGE 3
common carrier may not exceed three cases a day for each licensed retailer. A case may not
exceed two and thirty-eight hundredths gallons [9 liters].
3. As used in this section, "proof gallon" means a gallon [3.783.79 liters] of liquid at sixty degrees
Fahrenheit [15.5 degrees Celsius] which contains fifty percent ethyl alcohol by volume or its
equivalent.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 5-01-19.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
2. A manufacturing distillery may sell spirits produced by that distillery at off sale, in retail lots,
and not for resale, and may sell or direct ship its spirits to persons inside or outside the state
in a manner consistent with the laws of the place of the sale or delivery in total quantities not
in excess of twenty-five thousandforty thousand gallons [94635151416 liters] in a calendar
year.
a. Direct sales within this state are limited to two and thirty-eight hundredths gallons
[9 liters] or less per month per person for personal use and not for resale. The packaging
must conform with the labeling requirements in section 5-01-16. A licensee may dispense
free samples of the spirits offered for sale. Subject to local ordinance, sales at off sale
may be made on Sundays between twelve noon and twelve midnight.
b. A manufacturing distillery may hold events inside its premises and at its satellite location.
The tax commissioner may issue event permits for not more than forty event days per
calendar year to a manufacturing distillery to allow the manufacturing distillery, subject to
local ordinance, to give free samples of its product and to sell its product by the glass or
in closed containers at on-premises events on the premises, off the premises, and at its
satellite location.
c. A manufacturing distillery may not engage in any wholesaling activities. Except as
provided by section 5-01-19.1, all sales and deliveries of spirits to any other retail
licensed premises in this state may be made only through a licensed North Dakota liquor
wholesaler. However, a manufacturing distillery may sell distilled spirits to a domestic
winery if the distilled spirits were produced from products provided to the manufacturing
distillery by the domestic winery.

H. B. NO. 1466 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1466.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State